Illinois, session 104th, SB343.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Eminent Domain Act is amended by adding 5Section 25-5-145 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 30/25-5-145 new)7    Sec. 25-5-145. Quick-take; Cook County; Calumet City. 8    (a) Quick-take proceedings under Article 20 may be used 9for a period of no more than 2 years after the effective date 10of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly by Cook 11County and the City of Calumet City for the acquisition of the 12following described property for the purpose of economic 13development: 14    PARCEL 1:15    THAT PART OF THE NORTHWEST QUARTER OF SECTION 19, TOWNSHIP 16    36 NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN, 17    WHICH LIES NORTH AND EAST OF THE MARGIN OF THE LITTLE 18    CALUMET RIVER, EXCEPTING THEREFROM THE FOLLOWING:19        (A) THE EAST 660 FEET OF SAID NORTHWEST QUARTER;20        (B) THAT PART OF SAID NORTHWEST QUARTER WHICH IS BOTH 21        SOUTH OF A LINE PARALLEL TO AND 2,056.78 FEET SOUTH OF 22        THE NORTH LINE OF SAID QUARTER AND WEST OF A LINE 300   SB0343 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06462 JRC 16498 b1        FEET EAST OF AND PARALLEL TO THE EAST LINE OF TORRENCE 2        AVENUE;3        (C) THAT PART TAKEN, USED OR DEDICATED FOR TORRENCE 4        AVENUE, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THAT PART TAKEN 5        IN ORDER VESTING TITLE RECORDED OCTOBER 4, 2016 AS 6        DOCUMENT NO. 1627816040;7        (D) THAT PART THEREOF CONVEYED TO THE PUBLIC SERVICE 8        COMPANY OF NORTHERN ILLINOIS BY DEEDS DULY RECORDED 9        JULY 24, 1926 AS DOCUMENTS 9349854 AND 9350297;10        (E) THAT PART OF SAID NORTHWEST QUARTER DESCRIBED AS 11        FOLLOWS:12    COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF SAID QUARTER; THENCE 13    SOUTH ALONG THE WEST LINE OF SAID QUARTER, A DISTANCE OF 14    230 FEET; THENCE EASTERLY ON A LINE PARALLEL TO THE NORTH 15    LINE OF SAID QUARTER, A DISTANCE OF 250 FEET; THENCE NORTH 16    A DISTANCE OF 230 FEET TO A POINT ON THE NORTH LINE OF SAID 17    QUARTER; THENCE WESTERLY ALONG SAID NORTH LINE A DISTANCE 18    OF 250 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING;19        (F) THAT PART OF SAID NORTHWEST QUARTER OF SECTION 19, 20        TOWNSHIP 36 NORTH RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD PRINCIPAL 21        MERIDIAN, BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:22    BEGINNING AT THE NORTH WEST CORNER OF THE EAST 660 FEET OF 23    SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER; THENCE SOUTH O DEGREES 09 MINUTES 24    50 SECONDS WEST ON THE WEST LINE OF THE EAST 660 FEET OF 25    SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER A DISTANCE OF 1635.56 FEET; THENCE 26    NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF   SB0343 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06462 JRC 16498 b1    260.28 FEET; THENCE NORTH 28 DEGREES 30 MINUTES 00 SECONDS 2    EAST A DISTANCE OF 59.87 FEET; THENCE NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 3    MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 519.21 FEET; THENCE 4    SOUTH 45 DEGREES 17 MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 5    24.00 FEET; THENCE NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS 6    WEST A DISTANCE OF 110.00 FEET; THENCE SOUTH 45 DEGREES 17 7    MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 10.00 FEET; THENCE 8    NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 9    615.00 FEET; THENCE NORTH 0 DEGREES 17 MINUTES 30 SECONDS 10    EAST ON A LINE PERPENDICULAR TO THE NORTH LINE OF SAID 11    NORTH WEST QUARTER, A DISTANCE OF 543.00 FEET TO THE NORTH 12    LINE OF SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER; THENCE SOUTH 89 DEGREES 13    42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS EAST ON THE NORTH LINE OF SAID NORTH 14    WEST QUARTER A DISTANCE OF 1055.93 FEET TO THE PLACE OF 15    BEGINNING;16        (G) THAT PART OF THE NORTHWEST QUARTER OF SECTION 19, 17        TOWNSHIP 36 NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD 18        PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN, IN COOK COUNTY, ILLINOIS BOUNDED 19        AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:20    COMMENCING AT THE NORTH WEST CORNER OF SAID SECTION; 21    THENCE SOUTH ALONG THE WEST LINE OF SAID NORTH WEST 22    QUARTER, A DISTANCE OF 1284 FEET TO A POINT; THENCE EAST 23    71.05 FEET (MEASURED AT RIGHT ANGLE) TO A POINT ON THE EAST 24    LINE OF TORRENCE AVENUE, SAID POINT BEING THE POINT OF 25    BEGINNING; THENCE CONTINUING EAST ALONG THE LAST DESCRIBED 26    COURSE A DISTANCE OF 5 FEET TO A POINT; THENCE SOUTH ALONG   SB0343 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06462 JRC 16498 b1    A LINE PARALLEL TO AND DISTANT 5 FEET FROM SAID EAST LINE 2    OF TORRENCE AVENUE A DISTANCE OF 316.00 FEET TO A POINT; 3    THENCE WEST, FORMING A RIGHT ANGLE WITH THE LAST DESCRIBED 4    COURSE, A DISTANCE OF 5 FEET TO A POINT ON SAID EAST LINE 5    OF TORRENCE AVENUE; THENCE NORTH A DISTANCE OF 316.00 FEET 6    TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING;7        (H) THAT PART OF THE NORTHWEST QUARTER OF SECTION 19, 8        TOWNSHIP 36 NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD 9        PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN, IN COOK COUNTY, ILLINOIS, BOUNDED 10        AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:11    COMMENCING AT THE NORTH WEST CORNER OF SAID NORTH WEST 12    QUARTER; THENCE EAST A DISTANCE OF 250 FEET TO A POINT; 13    THENCE SOUTH A DISTANCE OF 30 FEET (MEASURED AT RIGHT 14    ANGLE) TO A POINT ON THE SOUTH LINE OF 159TH STREET, SAID 15    POINT BEING THE POINT OF BEGINNING; THENCE CONTINUING 16    SOUTH ALONG THE LAST DESCRIBED COURSE A DISTANCE OF 30 17    FEET TO A POINT; THENCE EAST ALONG A LINE PARALLEL TO AND 18    DISTANT 60 FEET FROM THE NORTH LINE OF SAID NORTH WEST 19    QUARTER, A DISTANCE OF 722.77 FEET TO A POINT; THENCE 20    NORTH ALONG A LINE FORMING A RIGHT ANGLE WITH THE LAST 21    DESCRIBED COURSE, A DISTANCE OF 30 FEET TO A POINT ON SAID 22    EAST LINE OF 159TH STREET; THENCE WEST A DISTANCE OF 23    722.77 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING;24        (I) THAT PART OF THE NORTHWEST QUARTER OF SECTION 19, 25        TOWNSHIP 36 NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD 26        PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN, BEING THE NORTH 150 FEET OF THE   SB0343 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06462 JRC 16498 b1        SOUTH 600 FEET OF THE WEST 150 FEET OF THE EAST 810 2        FEET OF SAID QUARTER SECTION, ALL IN COOK COUNTY, 3        ILLINOIS;4        (J) LOT 1 OF CALUMET SONIC SUBDIVISION, BEING A 5        SUBDIVISION OF PART OF THE NORTHWEST QUARTER OF 6        SECTION 19, TOWNSHIP 36 NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE 7        THIRD PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN, ACCORDING TO THE PLAT 8        THEREOF RECORDED NOVEMBER 5, 2010, AS DOCUMENT NO. 9        1030934049, IN COOK COUNTY, ILLINOIS.  10    PARCEL 2:11    EASEMENT FOR INGRESS AND EGRESS AND COMMON USE OF PARKING 12    OVER, UNDER, AND ACROSS THOSE PORTIONS OF THE FOLLOWING 13    DESCRIBED LAND:14    THAT PART OF SAID NORTHWEST 1/4 OF SECTION 19, TOWNSHIP 36 15    NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN, 16    BOUNDED AND DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:17    BEGINNING AT THE NORTH WEST CORNER OF THE EAST 660 FEET OF 18    SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER; THENCE SOUTH O DEGREES 09 MINUTES 19    50 SECONDS WEST ON THE WEST LINE OF THE EAST 660 FEET OF 20    SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER A DISTANCE OF 1635.56 FEET; THENCE 21    NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 22    260.28 FEET; THENCE NORTH 28 DEGREES 30 MINUTES 00 SECONDS 23    EAST A DISTANCE OF 59.87 FEET; THENCE NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 24    MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 519.21 FEET; THENCE 25    NORTH 45 DEGREES 17 MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF   SB0343 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06462 JRC 16498 b1    24.00 FEET; THENCE NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS 2    WEST A DISTANCE OF 110.00 FEET; THENCE NORTH 45 DEGREES 17 3    MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 10.00 FEET; THENCE 4    NORTH 44 DEGREES 42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS WEST A DISTANCE OF 5    615.00 FEET; THENCE NORTH O DEGREES 17 MINUTES 30 SECONDS 6    EAST ON A LINE PERPENDICULAR TO THE NORTH LINE OF SAID 7    NORTH WEST QUARTER, A DISTANCE OF 543.00 FEET TO THE NORTH 8    LINE OF SAID NORTH WEST QUARTER; THENCE SOUTH 89 DEGREES 9    42 MINUTES 30 SECONDS EAST ON THE NORTH LINE OF SAID NORTH 10    WEST QUARTER, A DISTANCE OF 1055.93 FEET TO THE PLACE OF 11    BEGINNING; EXCEPTING THEREFROM THE NORTH 30 FEET THEREOF 12    AND ALSO EXCEPTING THEREFROM THAT PART THEREOF CONVEYED IN 13    DEED FROM SEARS ROEBUCK AND COMPANY, TO THE STATE OF 14    ILLINOIS, DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC WORKS AND BUILDINGS DATED 15    AUGUST 29, 1966, AND RECORDED SEPTEMBER 28, 1966 AS 16    DOCUMENT NUMBER 19955757 AND FILED SEPTEMBER 28, 1966, AS 17    DOCUMENT NUMBER LR2294057, IN COOK COUNTY, ILLINOIS.18    AS CREATED BY OPERATING AGREEMENT DATED JUNE 23, 1965, A 19    MEMORANDUM OF WHICH WAS RECORDED JULY 22, 1965, AS 20    DOCUMENT NUMBER 19534723, AS AMENDED BY AMENDMENT DATED 21    JUNE 15, 1984, A MEMORANDUM OF WHICH WAS RECORDED AUGUST 22    27, 1984 AS DOCUMENT NUMBER 27229390, AND SECONDS 23    AMENDMENT DATED FEBRUARY 3, 1933, A MEMORANDUM OF WHICH 24    WAS RECORDED MARCH 2, 1933 AS DOCUMENT NUMBER 93154148.  25    PARCEL 3:  SB0343 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06462 JRC 16498 b1    THAT PART OF SAID NORTHWEST QUARTER WHICH IS BOTH SOUTH OF 2    A LINE PARALLEL TO AND 2,056.78 FEET SOUTH OF THE NORTH 3    LINE OF SAID QUARTER AND WEST OF A LINE 300 FEET EAST OF 4    AND PARALLEL TO THE EAST LINE OF TORRENCE AVENUE;5    EXCEPTING THEREFROM THAT PART OF THE LAND CONVEYED TO THE 6    STATE OF ILLINOIS, DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC WORKS AND 7    BUILDINGS RECORDED AS DOCUMENT NO. 19940215;8    AND EXCEPTING THAT PART OF THE LAND TAKEN IN CONDEMNATION 9    CASE NO. 14 L 050215.  10    PARCEL 4: INTENTIONALLY DELETED. 11    PARCEL 5: INTENTIONALLY DELETED. 12    PARCEL 6: INTENTIONALLY DELETED.  13    PARCEL 7:14    THAT PART OF THE SOUTHWEST QUARTER OF SECTION 19, TOWNSHIP 15    36 NORTH, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN 16    LYING EAST OF THE LITTLE CALUMET RIVER AND WEST OF THE 17    NORTH LINE OF THE PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY OF ILLINOIS AS 18    ESTABLISHED IN DEED 8393986 FALLING IN THE FOLLOWING 19    DESCRIBED LANDS:20    COMMENCING AT A POINT WHICH IS 10 CHAINS WEST OF THE 21    NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE NORTHWEST FRACTIONAL QUARTER OF 22    SECTION 19, IN TOWNSHIP 36, RANGE 15 EAST OF THE THIRD   SB0343 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06462 JRC 16498 b1    PRINCIPAL MERIDIAN; THENCE WEST 11 CHAINS AND 34 LINKS; 2    THENCE SOUTH 33 CHAINS AND 75 LINKS TO THE MARGIN OF THE 3    CALUMET RIVER; THENCE ALONG THE MARGIN OF SAID RIVER IN AN 4    EASTERLY DIRECTION UNTIL IT INTERSECTS A LINE RUNNING 5    NORTH AND SOUTH OF THE PLACE OF BEGINNING; THENCE NORTH 40 6    CHAINS TO THE PLACE OF BEGINNING, ALSO KNOWN AS LOT 2 OF A 7    SUBDIVISION OF SAID NORTHWEST QUARTER FRACTIONAL SECTION, 8    SITUATED IN THE TOWN OF SHERNTON IN THE COUNTY OF COOK, IN 9    THE STATE OF ILLINOIS.  10    PARCEL 8:11    RIGHTS AND EASEMENTS AS GRANTED IN THE OPERATING AGREEMENT 12    BETWEEN SEARS, ROEBUCK, AND COMPANY AND LASALLE NATIONAL 13    BANK UNDER TRUST NUMBER 30703, GOVERNING FUTURE 14    DEVELOPMENT AND USE OF THE PROPERTY AFFECTED THEREBY, AND 15    PROVIDING FOR INGRESS AND EGRESS BETWEEN THE AFFECTED 16    PARCELS AND FOR UTILITY EASEMENTS, A MEMORANDUM OF WHICH 17    AGREEMENT WAS RECORDED JULY 22, 1965, AS DOCUMENT NUMBER 18    19534723 AND REGISTERED JULY 22, 1965, AS DOCUMENT 19    LR2220909;20    AMENDMENT TO SAID OPERATING AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE PARTIES 21    ABOVE MENTIONED, A MEMORANDUM OF WHICH WAS RECORDED AUGUST 22    27, 1984, AS DOCUMENT 27229390 AND REGISTERED AUGUST 27, 23    1984, AS DOCUMENT LR3390805;24    MEMORANDUM OF SECOND AMENDMENT TO OPERATING AGREEMENT 25    DATED FEBRUARY 03, 1993, AND RECORDED MARCH 02, 1993 AS   SB0343 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06462 JRC 16498 b1    DOCUMENT NUMBER 93154148;  2    Tax Parcel Numbers: 30-19-100-129-0000; 3    30-19-100-112-0000; and 30-19-100-135-0000 4    (b) This Section is repealed 3 years after the effective 5date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.